District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1702.07

Admission, enrollment, and withdrawal

Repealed.

May 29, 1996, D.C. Law 11-135, § 201, 43 DCR 1699
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 54(a), 53 DCR 6198
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 803, 54 DCR 4102

History

1981 Ed., § 31-2811.

Prior Codifications

Section 2 of D.C. Laws 13-143 added subsec. (e).
Subsection 5(b) of D.C. Laws 13-143 Provided: “This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect or upon the effective date of the Moratorium on Conversion of Existing District of Columbia Public Schools into Charter Schools Amendment Act of 2000, or upon the date that final action is taken on Bill 13-582, the ‘District of Columbia School Reform Amendment Act of 1999’ and Bill 13-583, the ‘District of Columbia Public Charter School Conversion Petition Process Amendment Act of 2000’, or on amendments in the nature of a substitute to these two bills, whichever occurs first.”

Temporary Amendment of Section

Section 153 of Public Law 106-113 Amended Section 603(e)(2)(B) of the Student Loan Marketing Association Reorganization Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-208; 110 Stat. 3009-293).

Section 161 of Public Law 106-522 amended Section 603(e) of the Student Association Reorganization Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-208; 110 Stat. 3009-293).

Editor's Notes